Hawaii, session 2025, HB517.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Iolani Palace is the only royal palace in the United States in which a reigning monarch lived and is an icon of the State. Iolani Palace should be one of the State's most protected historical sites due to its importance to the people of Hawaii, especially out of respect for Hawaii's host culture and the Native Hawaiian people. The legislature finds that the grounds of Iolani Palace should be revered as highly as the Palace itself, and it is the duty of the State to protect one of Hawaii's most historic and treasured landmarks. Thousands of tourists visit Iolani Palace annually, and many have noted that among the hundreds of royal palaces worldwide, Iolani Palace is the only royal palace that contains metered parking within its grounds.  The continual desecration of the palace grounds as parking for state employees and tourists is highly offensive and a misuse of the historic landmark. The purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Prohibit parking on the grounds of Iolani Palace; (2)  Remove all blacktop, except for the "Grand Entrance" from King Street; and (3)  Replace all public parking areas and paid parking with a promenade. SECTION 2.  Chapter 184, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§184- Iolani Palace; parking prohibited.  (a)  No person shall park a motor vehicle on the grounds of Iolani Palace, except for necessary deliveries and administrative purposes. (b)  For the purposes of this section: "Motor vehicle" shall have the same meaning as in section 291C-1. "Park" shall have the same meaning as in section 291C-1." SECTION 3.  The department of accounting and general services shall submit to the legislature, no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2026, a cost analysis and proposed legislation, if necessary, for removing the blacktop, parking area, and paid parking adjacent to Iolani Palace. SECTION 4.  The department of land and natural resources shall submit to the legislature, no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2026, a cost analysis and proposed legislation, if necessary, for developing and maintaining a pedestrian area to replace the existing blacktop, parking area, and paid parking adjacent to Iolani Palace. SECTION 5.  (a) Commencing no later than January 1, 2026, the department of accounting and general services shall remove the blacktop, parking area, and paid public parking for visitors and state government employees who do not work at Iolani Palace. (b)  Upon removal of the blacktop, parking area, and paid parking adjacent to Iolani Palace, the department of land and natural resources shall develop and maintain a pedestrian area to replace the existing blacktop, parking area, and paid parking adjacent to Iolani Palace, reflecting as much as possible, the original palace grounds landscape as per photos from the Hawai'i State Archives.  The pedestrian area shall be composed of grass or other historically appropriate materials. SECTION 6.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 7.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval; provided that sections 2 and 5 shall take effect on January 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________